Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-134.02
Motion for reconsideration.

(1) Except with
respect to rate orders under the State Natural Gas Regulation Act entered
pursuant to section 66-1838, any party may file a motion for reconsideration
with the commission within ten days after the effective date of the order
as determined under section 75-134. The filing of a motion for reconsideration
shall suspend the time for filing a notice of intention to appeal pending
resolution of the motion, except that if the commission does not dispose of
a motion for reconsideration within sixty days after the filing of the motion,
the motion shall be deemed denied and the procedures for appeal in section
75-136 apply.

(2) Any party
to a general rate proceeding under the State Natural Gas Regulation Act may
file a motion for reconsideration within thirty days after the day an order
setting natural gas rates is entered by the commission. The filing of a motion
for reconsideration shall stay the order until the earlier of the date the
commission enters an order resolving the motion or one hundred twenty days
from the date of the order setting rates. Either party shall have thirty days
after the date the commission enters an order resolving the motion or the
expiration of the one-hundred-twenty-day period for considering the motion,
whichever is earlier, in which to file an appeal.

Laws 2013, LB545, § 7.

State Natural Gas Regulation Act, see section 66-1801.